Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Electronic Filing and Storage of Court Documents

§ 9-1-51.
Definitions.

For purposes of Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context shall otherwise require:

“Court” shall mean the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, circuit courts, chancery courts, county courts, youth courts, family courts, justice courts and the municipal courts of this state.

“Clerk” shall mean the clerks of any court.

“Judge” shall mean the senior judge of any court.

“County office” shall mean the office of the circuit clerk, chancery clerk, tax assessor and tax collector of every county of this state.

“Documents,” “court records,” or “court-related records” shall mean and include, but not be limited to, all contents in the file or record of any case or matter docketed by the court, administrative orders, court minutes, court dockets and ledgers, and other documents, instruments or papers required by law to be filed with the court.

“Electronic filing of documents” shall mean the transmission of data to a clerk of any court or state agency by the communication of information which is originally displayed in written form and thereafter converted to digital electronic signals, transformed by computer and stored by the clerk or state agency either on microfilm, magnetic tape, optical discs or any other medium.

“Electronic storage of documents” shall mean the storage, retention and reproduction of documents using microfilm, microfiche, data processing, computers or other electronic process which correctly and legibly stores and reproduces or which forms a medium for storage, copying or reproducing documents.

“Filing system” or “storage system” shall mean the system used by a court or county office for the electronic filing or storage of documents.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 506, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 507, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1997).

§ 9-1-53.
Authority to electronically file and store court documents.

Courts and county offices are hereby authorized but not required to institute procedures for the electronic filing and electronic storage of court documents to further the efficient administration and operation of the courts. Electronically filed or stored documents may be kept in lieu of any paper documents. Courts governed by rules promulgated by the Mississippi Supreme Court that institute electronic filing and electronic storage of court documents and offices of circuit and chancery clerks that institute electronic filing and electronic storage of court documents shall do so in conformity with such rules and regulations prescribed by the Administrative Office of Courts and adopted by the Mississippi Supreme Court concerning court records or court-related records. The provisions of Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57 shall not be construed to amend or repeal any other provision of existing state law which requires or provides for the maintenance of official written documents, records, dockets, books, ledgers or proceedings by a court or clerk of court in those courts which do not elect to exercise the discretion granted by this section. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the Legislature that official written documents, records, dockets, books, ledgers or proceedings may be filed, stored, maintained, reproduced and recorded in the manner authorized by Sections 9-1-51 through 9-1-57 or as otherwise provided by law, in the discretion of the clerk.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 490, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 507, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1997).

§ 9-1-55.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-1-55. [En Laws, 1987, ch. 490, § 3]

§ 9-1-57.
Plan for electronic storage system.

A plan for the storage system shall require, but not be limited to, the following:

All original documents shall be recorded and released into the system within a specified minimum time period after presentation to the clerk;

Original paper records may be used during the pendency of any legal proceeding;

The plan shall include setting standards for organizing, identifying, coding and indexing so that the image produced during the duplicating process can be certified as a true and correct copy of the original and may be retrieved rapidly;

All materials used in the duplicating process which correctly and legibly reproduces or which forms a medium of copying or reproducing all public records, as herein authorized, and all processes of development, fixation and washing of said photographic duplicates shall be of a quality approved for permanent photographic records by the United States Bureau of Standards;

The plan shall provide for retention of the court records consistent with other law and in conformity with rules and regulations prescribed by the Administrative Office of Courts and adopted by the Mississippi Supreme Court and shall provide security provisions to guard against physical loss, alterations and deterioration; and

All transcripts, exemplifications, copies or reproductions on paper or on film of an image or images of any microfilmed or otherwise duplicated record shall be deemed to be certified copies of the original for all purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 490, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 507, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1997).